New Jersey, session 222, A2049.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  The Legislature finds and declares that it is an important public policy to protect animals and consumers from the well-documented puppy-mill-to-pet-store pipeline and support the adoption of homeless animals from animal rescue organizations, animal shelters, and pounds; and that consumers also have the option to buy puppies or kittens directly from responsible breeders who take excellent care of their animals and do not sell their puppies or kittens through third-party retailers. The Legislature also finds and declares that despite the consumer protections enacted by the State, some pet shops continue to obtain cats and dogs from kitten and puppy mills with egregious animal welfare records; that federal oversight of commercial breeders that sell cats and dogs to pet stores is minimal, and the federal standards established by federal regulations are limited, mere survival standards; that kitten and puppy mills sell sick and unsocialized pets, mislead consumers, and engage in predatory pricing practices; and that cats, dogs, and rabbits sold by pet shops are often abandoned or surrendered to animal rescues, shelters, or pounds. The Legislature furthermore finds and declares that shelters and animal rescue organizations buying kittens and puppies from commercial breeders inadvertently fund the mistreatment of cats and dogs by commercial breeders; and that shelters and animal rescue organizations across the nation can responsibly find homes for cats from kitten mills and dogs from puppy mills without financially compensating the commercial breeding industry that created the problem. The Legislature therefore determines that it is in the best interest of the citizens of the State to prohibit the sale of cats, dogs, and rabbits by pet shops, and to encourage pet shops to employ a humane and responsible business model which collaborates with animal rescue organizations, shelters, and pounds to showcase pets available for adoption.  The Legislature also determines that it is in the best interest of the citizens of the State to prohibit animal rescue organizations, shelters, and pounds from obtaining cats or dogs from breeders or brokers for payment or compensation. 2.    (New section) As used in sections 1 through 6 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Animal rescue organization" means the same as that term is  defined in section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1). Animal rescue organization facility means the same as that term is defined in  section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1). "Breeder" means any person, firm, corporation, or organization in the business of breeding cats or dogs. "Broker" means any person, firm, corporation, or organization who transfers a cat or dog for resale by another. "Consumer" means a person purchasing a cat or dog not for the purposes of resale. "Kennel" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1). "Pet dealer" means any person engaged in the ordinary course of business in the sale of cats or dogs to the public for profit or any person who sells or offers for sale more than five cats or dogs in one year.  The term pet dealer shall not include a pet shop. "Pet shop" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1). "Pound" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1). "Shelter" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1). "Unfit for purchase" means having any disease, deformity, injury, physical condition, illness, or defect which is congenital or hereditary and severely affects the health of the animal, or which was manifest, capable of diagnosis or likely contracted on or before the sale and delivery of the animal to the consumer. 3.    (New section) a.  The provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not alter, diminish, replace, or revoke the requirements for pet dealers or the rights of a consumer purchasing an animal from a pet dealer as may be provided in law, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.  Any provision of law pertaining to pet shops, or rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, that does not pertain to the sale of cats, dogs, or rabbits shall continue to apply to pet shops.  No provision of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall alter, diminish, replace, or revoke any recourse or remedy that is otherwise available to a consumer purchasing a cat, dog, rabbit, or any other type of animal provided under any other law. b.    It shall be an unlawful practice and a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) for any breeder, broker, or kennel to knowingly sell a cat or dog that is unfit for purchase.  The death of an animal within 14 days after the date of its delivery to the consumer, except by death by accident or as a result of injuries sustained during that period, shall be construed to mean the animal was unfit for purchase. 4.    (New section) No animal rescue organization or animal rescue organization facility, pet shop, shelter, or pound may obtain a cat, dog, or rabbit from a breeder or broker in exchange for payment or compensation, monetary or otherwise. 5.    (New section)  a.  No pet shop shall sell or offer for sale a cat, dog, or rabbit.  A pet shop may sell or offer for sale any other type of animal as may be otherwise authorized pursuant to State law, or rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or pet supplies for any type of animal, including a cat, dog, or rabbit. b.  A pet shop may, in collaboration with an animal rescue organization, shelter, or pound, offer space in the pet shop to showcase cats, dogs, or rabbits that are available for adoption, provided that no payment or compensation, monetary or otherwise, is exchanged between the pet shop and animal rescue organization, shelter, or pound, for any animal being showcased. c.  A person who violates the provisions of subsection a. or b. of this section shall be subject to a fine of $1,000 for each violation, to be collected by the municipality in which the violation occurs in a civil action by a summary proceeding under the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  Each cat, dog, or rabbit sold in violation of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall constitute a separate offense under this section.  Upon a pet shop being found liable for three or more violations pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the court shall order the revocation of the license of the pet shop and may order a permanent prohibition against the pet shop being licensed or operating in any municipality in the State.  The Superior Court and the municipal court shall have jurisdiction over proceedings for the enforcement of the penalties established by this section. 6.    (New section) No provision of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be construed to interfere with the implementation of, or otherwise invalidate, or limit or restrict any municipality, county, local health agency, or municipal or county board of health from enacting or enforcing, any law, ordinance, rule, or regulation that places additional obligations or restrictions on kennels, pet shops, kennel or pet shop sales, pet dealers, breeders, brokers, or pet dealer, breeder, or broker sales. 7.  Section 1 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.1 et seq.): "Animal rescue organization" means an individual or group of individuals who do not operate for profit, with or without salary or compensation, house and care for homeless animals in the home of an individual or in other facilities, with the intent of placing the animals in responsible, more permanent homes as soon as possible. "Animal rescue organization facility" means the home or other facility that is not operated for profit in which an animal rescue organization houses and cares for an animal. "Certified animal control officer" means a person 18 years of age or older who has satisfactorily completed the course of study approved by the Commissioner of Health and Senior Services and the Police Training Commission as prescribed by paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1983, c.525 (C.4:19-15.16a); or who has been employed in the State of New Jersey in the capacity of, and with similar responsibilities to those required of, a certified animal control officer pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1983, c.525 for a period of three years before January 17, 1987. "Dog" means any dog, bitch or spayed bitch. "Dog of licensing age" means any dog which has attained the age of seven months or which possesses a set of permanent teeth. "Foster home" means placement of a cat or dog with an individual or group that is not an animal rescue organization for the purpose of temporarily caring for the cat or dog, without the individual or group assuming ownership and with the intent of the individual or group relinquishing the cat or dog to a suitable owner when one is located. "Kennel" means any establishment wherein or whereon the business of boarding or selling dogs or breeding dogs is carried on [, except a pet shop]. "Owner" when applied to the proprietorship of a dog shall include every person having a right of property in that dog and every person who has that dog in [his] the persons keeping, and when applied to the proprietorship of any other animal, including, but not limited to, a cat, shall include every person having a right of property in that animal and every person who has that animal in [his] the persons keeping. "Pet shop" means [any place of business which is not part of a kennel,] a retail establishment wherein animals [, including, but not limited to, dogs, cats, birds, fish, reptiles, rabbits, hamsters or gerbils,] not born on the premises are kept or displayed chiefly for the purpose of sale to, or adoption by, individuals for personal appreciation and companionship rather than for business or research purposes. "Pound" means an establishment for the confinement of dogs or other animals seized either under the provisions of this act or otherwise. "Shelter" means any establishment where dogs or other animals are received, housed, and distributed that is not operated for profit and is not an animal rescue organization facility, foster home, kennel, pet shop, or pound. The term shelter shall include, but need not be limited to, such an establishment whose primary mission and practice is the placement of abandoned, unwanted, neglected, or abused animals, and may be either: owned or maintained by, or under contract with, the State, a county, or a municipality; or owned or maintained by, or under contract with, a nonprofit organization that is established for the purpose of sheltering animals. "Sterilize" means to render an animal incapable of reproducing by either spaying or neutering. (cf: P.L.2011, c.142, s.1) 8.    Section 8 of P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.8) is amended to read as follows: 8.    a.  Any person who keeps or operates or proposes to establish a kennel, a pet shop, a shelter or a pound shall apply to the clerk or other official designated to license dogs in the municipality where such establishment is located, for a license entitling [him] the licensee to keep or operate such establishment.  A person who operates or proposes to operate an establishment that serves multiple functions as a kennel, pet shop, shelter, or pound shall apply for a license for each function the establishment performs. A retail establishment that does not sell animals, but that keeps and displays animals for an animal rescue organization, shelter, or pound solely for the purpose of offering the animals for adoption, shall not require a pet shop license. The application shall describe the premises where the establishment is located or is proposed to be located, the purpose or purposes for which it is to be maintained, and shall be accompanied by the written approval of the local municipal and health authorities showing compliance with the local and State rules and regulations governing location of and sanitation at such establishments. b.    All licenses issued for a kennel, pet shop, shelter, or pound shall state the purpose for which the establishment is maintained, and all licenses shall expire on the last day of June of each year, and be subject to revocation by the municipality on recommendation of the Department of Health or the local board of health for failure to comply with the rules and regulations of the State department or local board governing the same, after the owner has been afforded a hearing by either the State department or local board [, except as provided in subsection c. of this section]. Any person holding a license shall not be required to secure individual licenses for dogs owned by a licensee and kept at the establishments; the licenses shall not be transferable to another owner or different premises. c.     [The license for a pet shop shall be subject to review by the municipality, upon recommendation by the Department of Health or the local health authority for failure by the pet shop to comply with the rules and regulations of the State department or local health authority governing pet shops or if the pet shop meets the criteria for recommended suspension or revocation provided under subsection c. or d. of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.336 (C.56:8-96), after the owner of the pet shop has been afforded a hearing pursuant to subsection e. of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.336 (C.56:8-96). The municipality, based on the criteria for the recommendation of the local health authority provided under subsections c. and d. of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.336 (C.56:8-96), may suspend the license for 90 days or may revoke the license if it is determined at the hearing that the pet shop: (1) failed to maintain proper hygiene and exercise reasonable care in safeguarding the health of animals in its custody or (2) sold a substantial number of animals that the pet shop knew, or reasonably should have known, to be unfit for purchase.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) d.    The municipality may issue a license for a pet shop that permits the pet shop to sell pet supplies for all types of animals, including cats [and], dogs, and rabbits, and sell animals other than cats [and], dogs [but restricts the pet shop from selling cats or dogs, or both], and rabbits. e.     [Every pet shop licensed in the State shall submit annually  and no later than May 1 of each year records of the total number of cats and dogs, respectively, sold by the pet shop each year to the municipality in which it is located, and the municipality shall provide this information to the local health authority.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) f.     The license for a kennel, pet shop, shelter, or pound may be subject to review for suspension or revocation if the kennel, pet shop, shelter, or pound fails to comply with the rules and regulations governing the sanitary conduct and operation of kennels, pet shops, shelters, or pounds adopted pursuant to P.L.1941, c.151 (C.4:19-15.14) or the provisions of P.L.    , c. (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) that are applicable to the facility.  No license shall be suspended or revoked without a hearing or a courts determination of liability pursuant to subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). g.  On or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.   (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), any license for a pet shop issued or renewed by the municipality shall not permit the pet shop to sell or offer for sale cats, dogs, or rabbits. (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.5) 9.    The following sections are repealed:  sections 1 through 5, and section 7 of P.L.1999, c.336 (C.56:8-92 through C.56:8-95, C.56:8-96, and C.56:8-97); and sections 3 through 5 of P.L.2015, c.7 (C.56:8-95.1 through C.56:8-95.3). 10. This act shall take effect on the 180th day following enactment.